Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-2,162.13
Commercial fertilizer or beneficial substance; registration or license; cancellation; reasons; hearing.

The director is authorized and empowered to cancel the registration or license of any person manufacturing or distributing any commercial fertilizer or beneficial substance or to refuse to register any beneficial substance upon satisfactory evidence that the registrant, licensee, or guarantor has used fraudulent or deceptive practices in the evasions or attempted evasions of the provisions of the Nebraska Commercial Fertilizer and Beneficial Substances Act or any rules and regulations promulgated thereunder. No license or registration shall be revoked or refused until the registrant, licensee, or guarantor has been given the opportunity to appear for a hearing before the director.

Laws 1955, c. 334, § 13, p. 1044;

Laws 1975, LB 333, § 14;

Laws 1980, LB 889, § 6;

Laws 1992, LB 366, § 33;

Laws 2026, LB948, § 21.
March 17, 2026